Utah statutes.
70A-2-723.   Proof of market price -- Time and place.

(1)  If an action based on anticipatory repudiation comes to trial before the
time for performance with respect to some or all of the goods, any damages
based on market price (Section 70A-2-708 or Section 70A-2-713) shall be
determined according to the price of such goods prevailing at the time when
the aggrieved party learned of the repudiation.
(2)  If evidence of a price prevailing at the times or places described in
this chapter is not readily available the price prevailing within any
reasonable time before or after the time described or at any other place which
in commercial judgment or under usage of trade would serve as a reasonable
substitute for the one described may be used, making any proper allowance for
the cost of transporting the goods to or from such other place.
(3)  Evidence of a relevant price prevailing at a time or place other than the
one described in this chapter offered by one party is not admissible unless
and until he has given the other party such notice as the court finds
sufficient to prevent unfair surprise.
